Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-504
Arson, third degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits arson in the third degree if he or she intentionally sets fire to, burns, causes to be burned, or by the use of any explosive, damages or destroys, or causes to be damaged or destroyed, any property of another person without such other person's consent. Such property shall not be contained within a building and shall not be a building or occupied structure.

(2) Arson in the third degree is a Class IV felony if the damages amount to one thousand five hundred dollars or more.

(3) Arson in the third degree is a Class I misdemeanor if the damages are five hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars.

(4) Arson in the third degree is a Class II misdemeanor if the damages are less than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 103;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 27.

Under this section, the amount of damages involved in the crime of third degree arson affects the severity of the punishment. Although the amount of damages is not an element of arson, the State must prove by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt the amount of damages to the property that was damaged by arson in order to prove that the arson was a Class IV felony. State v. Arellano, 262 Neb. 866, 636 N.W.2d 616 (2001).